Utah statutes.
13-13-5.   Bids -- Contents.

If bids are solicited from exhibitors for the purpose of entering into a license agreement, the bid shall include in the invitation to bid the date, time and location of the trade screening of the motion picture that is the subject of the invitation to bid.

